Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.070

Legal aid county committee created.

The legal aid county committee (hereinafter called the committee), if created and continued by resolution of the bar board, shall consist of three members chosen by the bar board as follows: A member of the bar board, who shall be chair, a judge of the superior court of the county, and an active member of the Washington state bar association, resident in the county.

[ 2011 c 336 s 69; 1939 c 93 s 7; RRS s 10007-207. Formerly RCW 74.36.070.]